Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-305.04
Regional centers; rehabilitation model.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall utilize a rehabilitation model when appropriate for services provided at the regional centers under the jurisdiction of the department. For purposes of this section, rehabilitation model means a comprehensive approach to treatment and rehabilitation of a person with a disability caused by a mental illness in order to assure that such person can perform those physical, emotional, social, and intellectual skills needed to live and work in the community.

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 81;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 222.